ro-RO: Tip de mecanism pentru introducerea aței în ac: Dispozitiv de înfilat integrat pe tăietorul de ață; Cârlig; Cârlig cu clapetă; Stil cu inserție a acului cu înfilare automată; Buclă din sârmă; Altele
ru: Тип механизма нитевдевателя: Встроенный нитковдеватель на нитеобрезателе; Крючок; Вязальный крючок с язычком; В виде устройства для самозаправляющихся игл; Проволочная петля; Другой
lt-LT: Adatos įvėriklio mechanizmo tipas: Integruotas adatos įvėrėjas ant siūlų kirpiklio; Kabliukas; Kabliukas su liežuvėliu; Savaiminio įvėrimo įtaisas; Vielinė kilputė; Kita
de: Einfädelungsmechanismus: Integrierter Nadeleinfädler an Fadenabschneider; Haken; Knüpfhaken; Selbsteinfädelnd; Drahtschlaufe; Sonstiges
nb: Type mekanisme for itreding av nål: Innebygd nålitreder på trådkutter; Krok; Låsekrok; Selvtreende nålinnsetter; Ståltrådløkke; Annet
zh-TW: 穿針器機制類型: 切線器內建穿線器; 鉤式; 舌簧鉤; 自動穿線器款式; 金屬線圈; 其他
da: Nåletråderens mekanismetype: Indbygget nåletråder på trådskærer; Krog; Låsekrog; Selvtrådende nåleindsætter-stil; Trådløkke; Andet
sk-SK: Typ mechanizmu navliekača ihly: Vstavaný navliekač ihiel na odstrihávači nite; Háčik; Západkový háčik; Samočinný navliekač ihiel; Drôtená slučka; Iné
es: Tipo de mecanismo del enhebrador de agujas: Enhebrador integrado en el cortahílos; Gancho; Gancho con lengüeta; Estilo de insertador de aguja autoenhebrable; Bucle de alambre; Otro
it: Tipo di meccanismo dell'infilatore dell'ago: Infila aghi integrato sul tagliafilo; Gancio; Gancio a scrocco; Tipo inseritore di aghi auto-infilante; Anello in filo metallico; Altro
sv: Typ av mekanism för nålträdare: Inbyggd nålpåträdare på trådklippare; Krok; Spärrhake; Modell med självträdande nålisättare; Trådögla; Övrigt
vi: Loại cơ chế xỏ chỉ kim: Dụng cụ xỏ kim tích hợp trên dụng cụ cắt chỉ; Móc; Móc chốt; Kiểu xỏ kim tự động; Vòng dây thép; Khác
th: ประเภทกลไกการสนเข็ม: ที่สนเข็มในตัวบนที่ตัดด้าย; ตะขอ; ตะขอแบบมีลิ้นเปิดปิด; รูปแบบที่ใส่เข็มสนด้ายอัตโนมัติ; ห่วงลวด; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de mecanismo do passador de linha: Passador de linha integrado no cortador de linha; Gancho; Gancho com trava; Estilo insersor de agulha de passagem automática; Laço de arame; Outro
nl: Type mechanisme naaldinrijger: Ingebouwde draaddoorsteker op draadafsnijder; Haak; Haak met sluiting; Zelfinrijgende naaldinzetter; Draadlus; Anders
el: Τύπος μηχανισμού περάσματος βελόνας: Ενσωματωμένος περαστής κλωστής στον κόφτη κλωστής; Άγκιστρο; Βελονάκι σμύρνας; Τύπος εισαγωγέα βελόνας με αυτόματο πέρασμα κλωστής; Συρμάτινη θηλιά; Άλλο
ja: 糸通しメカニズムタイプ: 糸切り器内蔵の糸通し; フック; ラッチフック; セルフスレッディングニードルインサータースタイル; ワイヤーループ; その他
fi: Neulan langanpujottimen mekanismityyppi: Sisäänrakennettu langanpujotin langankatkaisijassa; Koukku; Salpakoukku; Itsepujottava neulanasetinmalli; Lankalenkki; Muu
ko: 실 끼우개 메커니즘 유형: 실 커터 내장 실 끼우개; 훅; 래치 훅; 자동 실 끼우기 바늘 삽입기 스타일; 와이어 루프; 기타
cs: Typ mechanismu navlékače jehly: Integrovaný navlékač na odstřihovači nití; Háček; Západkový háček; Samočinný zavaděč jehly; Drátěné očko; Ostatní
pl: Typ mechanizmu nawlekacza do nici: Wbudowany nawlekacz na obcinaku do nici; Haczyk; Szydełko z zapadką; Mechanizm wprowadzający z automatycznym nawlekaniem; Pętelka z drutu; Inne
hu: Tűbefűző mechanizmus típusa: Beépített tűbefűző a szálvágón; Horog; Reteszes horog; Önbefűzős tűbehelyező típus; Dróthurok; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de mecanismo do enfiador de linha: Enfiador de agulhas incorporado no cortador de linha; Gancho; Gancho com trinco; Estilo de enfiador de agulha com autoenfiamento; Argola de arame; Outro
bg-BG: Тип механизъм за вдяване на конец в игла: Вградена вдевачка на резеца за конци; Кукичка; Кукичка с езиче; Тип вдевачка за самовдеващи се игли; Телена примка; Друго
zh-CN: 穿针器装置类型: 割线器上内置穿线器; 挂钩; 舌簧钩; 自穿线引针器型; 钢丝环; 其他
fr: Type de mécanisme d'enfilage d'aiguille: Enfile-aiguille intégré sur le coupe-fil; Crochet; Crochet à loquet; Style d’inséreur d’aiguille à enfilage automatique; Boucle métallique; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta mehanizma uvlačivača konca: Ugrađeni uvlakivač konca na rezaču konca; Kukica; Kukica sa zasunom; Vrsta alata za samouvlačenje konca u iglu; Žičana petlja; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta mehanizma vdevalca niti: Vgrajen vdevalec sukanca na rezalniku niti; Kavelj; Kavelj z zapahom; Samodejno vdevanje sukanca z vstavljanjem igle; Žična zanka; Drugo
tr: İplik geçirici mekanizma tipi: İplik kesici üzerinde dahili iğneye iplik geçirme aparatı; Kanca; Mandal kancası; Kendinden iplik geçiren iğne takıcı stili; Tel döngü; Diğer
en: Needle threader mechanism type: Built-in needle threader on thread cutter; Hook; Latch hook; Self-threading needle inserter style; Wire loop; Other